Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Chapter 15 Dentists and Dental Hygienists

Cross references. —

As to licensing provisions generally, see chapter 1 of this title.

As to nurses, see chapter 21 of this title.

As to physicians and surgeons, see chapter 26 of this title.

As to exemption of dentists from Wyoming Pharmacy Act, see §

33-24-129

.

As to immunity from liability for volunteer health care professionals, see §

1-1-129

.

For provisions relating to dentists with regard to public health and safety generally, see title 35.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

61 Am. Jur. 2d Physicians, Surgeons, and Other Healers §§ 6, 38, 248.

Liability of physician, surgeon, anesthetist, or dentist for injury resulting from foreign object left in patient, 10 ALR3d 9.

Improper or immoral conduct toward female patient as ground for disciplinary measure against physician or dentist, 15 ALR3d 1179.

What constitutes total or permanent disability within the meaning of insurance policy issued to physician or dentist, 21 ALR3d 677.

Professional incompetency as ground for disciplinary measure against physician or dentist, 28 ALR3d 487.

Medical malpractice: liability for injury allegedly resulting from negligence in making hypodermic injection, 45 ALR3d 731.

Wrongful cancellation of medical malpractice insurance, 99 ALR3d 469.

Recovery, and measure and element of damages, in action against dentist for breach of contract to achieve particular result or cure, 11 ALR4th 748.

Liability for dental malpractice in provision or fitting of dentures, 77 ALR4th 222.

Liability of orthodontist for malpractice, 81 ALR4th 632.

§ 33-15-101.
Board of dental examiners; generally.

The board shall carry out the purposes and enforce the provisions of this act. The board shall consist of six (6) members appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the state senate. Appointments made between sessions of the legislature shall be made in accordance with W.S.

28-12-101

. The interim appointments are not considered a term for the purposes of subsection (c) of this section, relating to reappointment to the board.

The term for board members is four (4) years, and expires on March 1. Effective July 1, 1979, appointments and terms shall be in accordance with W.S.

28-12-101

through

28-12-103

.

No person is eligible to membership on the board who is not legally qualified to practice; who has not engaged in the active practice of dentistry in the state of Wyoming for at least five (5) continuous years immediately prior to appointment; who does not at the time of his appointment hold a certificate entitling him to practice dentistry in the state of Wyoming; and who is not a resident of the state of Wyoming. One (1) appointed member of the board shall be a dental hygienist who has the qualifications provided in this act. No member shall succeed himself in office for more than two (2) successive terms.

Any vacancy upon the board caused by the resignation, death or removal of a member shall be filled by the governor by appointment for the unexpired term of that member. Any appointment to fill a vacancy shall be made within ninety (90) days after the vacancy occurs.

Appointments by the governor to the board shall be made from a list of recommended names submitted by the Wyoming Dental Association and Wyoming Dental Hygiene Association as follows:

The Wyoming Dental Association shall, through its secretary, present to the governor within fifteen (15) days after its regular annual meeting a list of the names of not less than ten (10) candidates from which appointments for vacancies on the board occurring during the ensuing year shall be made; and

The Wyoming Dental Hygiene Association shall, through its secretary, present to the governor within fifteen (15) days after its regular annual meeting a list of not less than three (3) candidates from which appointments for vacancies on the board occurring during the ensuing year shall be made.

Each member of the board shall, before entering upon the duties of his office, take and subscribe an oath or affirmation that he will support the constitution and the laws of the United States and the state of Wyoming, and that he will faithfully perform the duties as a member of the board.

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 210, § 3.

History.

Laws 1905, ch. 89, § 2; C.S. 1910, § 2883; C.S. 1920, § 3546; Laws 1921, ch. 148, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 34-102; C.S. 1945, § 37-1102; Laws 1955, ch. 242, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-195; Laws 1969, ch. 35, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 33-192.1; Laws 1979, ch. 17, § 2; ch. 74, § 1; 1981, ch. 172, § 1; 1990, ch. 113, § 2; 2007, ch. 210, § 3.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, repealed former (g), which read: “The dental hygienist member of the board may act on all matters properly before the board except those matters involving the issuance, renewal or revocation of licenses of dentists in Wyoming.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the first sentence in subsection (a) and in the second sentence in subsection (c), see § 33-15-128(a)(xvii).

§ 33-15-102.
Board of dental examiners; officers; seal; meetings; quorum.

The board shall elect from its members a president, vice-president and a secretary-treasurer. The board shall have a common seal. The board shall meet in June each year, and more often if necessary, at such times and places designated by the president and the board. The meeting of the board shall be at the call of the president and the secretary-treasurer. Five (5) days notice shall be given by the secretary-treasurer to all board members of the time and place of the meeting. A majority of the board constitutes a quorum.

Repealed by Laws 1981, ch. 172, § 3.

History.

Laws 1905, ch. 89, § 3; C.S. 1910, § 2884; Laws 1915, ch. 65, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 3547; R.S. 1931, § 34-103; C.S. 1945, § 37-1103; Laws 1955, ch. 242, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 33-196; Laws 1969, ch. 35, § 2; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 33-192.2; Laws 1981, ch. 172, §§ 1, 3.

§ 33-15-103.
Board of dental examiners; removal of members.

The governor may remove any member as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

or for discontinued residence in Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1905, ch. 89, § 2; C.S. 1910, § 2883; C.S. 1920, § 3546; Laws 1921, ch. 148, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 34-102; C.S. 1945, § 37-1102; Laws 1955, ch. 242, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-195; Laws 1969, ch. 35, § 3; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 33-192.3; Laws 1981, ch. 172, § 1; 1987, ch. 175, § 1.

§ 33-15-104.
Board of dental examiners; indebtedness; compensation.

The board shall not create any indebtedness on behalf of the state of Wyoming, except as provided in this section. Out of the funds assessed by the board, each of the members of the board shall receive compensation each day or part of a day in which they are engaged in performance of their official duties, including necessary travel, at the same rate as state legislators and shall receive per diem and mileage as provided in W.S. 33-1-302(a)(vii) incurred in the performance of their official duties. The secretary of the board shall receive compensation for his services.

History.

Laws 1905, ch. 89, § 8; C.S. 1910, § 2889; Laws 1915, ch. 65, § 3; C.S. 1920, § 3552; R.S. 1931, § 34-108; C.S. 1945, § 37-1107; Laws 1957, ch. 253, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 33-197; Laws 1969, ch. 35, § 4; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 33-192.4; Laws 1973, ch. 179, § 1; 1981, ch. 172, § 1; 2007, ch. 210, § 2; 2009, ch. 181, § 1; 2014 ch. 69, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

Cross references. —

As to meal, lodging and traveling expenses of state officers and employees, see §

9-3-102

.

As to amount of mileage fee or mileage expenses to state, county or precinct officers or employees, see §

9-3-103

.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, deleted “as” following “board shall receive”, substituted “for each day or part of a day in which they are engaged in performance of their official duties at the same rate as state legislators and shall be reimbursed for” for “the sum of seventy-five dollars ($75.00) for each day actually engaged in the duties of his office,” and substituted “incurred in the performance of their official duties” for “in the same manner and amount as employees of the state of Wyoming,” at the end of the second sentence.

The 2009 amendment,

inserted “including necessary travel” following “performance of their official duties” in the first sentence.

Laws 2009, ch. 181, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 11, 2009.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, substituted “shall receive per diem and mileage as provided in W.S. 33-1-302(a)(vii)” for “shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses” in the first sentence.

§ 33-15-105.
Disposition of monies received and collected under provisions of chapter; report.

All monies shall be received and collected as provided by law. The state treasurer shall place the money in a separate account, which shall only be paid out upon an authorized voucher duly verified by the board president and signed by the president and either the secretary of the board, or his designee, showing that the expenditure is a necessary expense and has been actually and properly incurred by the board. Upon presentation of the voucher, the auditor shall draw the warrant upon the treasurer but no warrant shall be drawn unless and until there are sufficient monies in the account to pay same and the expenses of the board shall not be charged upon any other state fund or account. Any money on hand at the dissolution of the board or the repeal of this act shall be paid to the credit of the common school permanent land fund account.

The board shall report annually to the governor respecting all activities, as required by W.S.

9-2-1014

.

History.

Laws 1905, ch. 89, § 8; C.S. 1910, § 2889; Laws 1915, ch. 65, § 3; C.S. 1920, § 3552; R.S. 1931, § 34-108; C.S. 1945, § 37-1107; Laws 1957, ch. 253, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 33-197; Laws 1969, ch. 35, § 5; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 33-192.5; Laws 1973, ch. 179, § 1; ch. 215, § 1; ch. 245, § 3; 1981, ch. 172, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2009, ch. 181, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a), substituted “a separate account” for “an account within the earmarked revenue fund” in the second sentence.

The 2009 amendment,

in (a), in the second sentence, inserted “by the board president and signed by the president and either the secretary of the board, or his designee” following “duly verified” and substituted “either the secretary of the board or his designee” for “secretary of the board.”

Laws 2009, ch. 181, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 11, 2009.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For meaning of “this act,” see § 33-15-128(a)(xvii).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 33-15-106.
Determination of fees.

The board shall establish fees by rule and regulation for the issuance of licenses and administration of examinations pursuant to this act.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 35, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 33-192.6; Laws 1981, ch. 172, § 1; 2007, ch. 210, § 2.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “establish fees by rule and regulation for the issuance of licenses and administration of examinations pursuant to this act” for “determine each year the fees to be collected for examinations, reexaminations and renewals.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-15-128(a)(xvii).

§ 33-15-107.
Sale of license.

Any member of the board who sells or offers to sell any license, or modify scoring or grading of a test to issue a license is subject to prosecution under W.S.

6-5-102

.

History.

Laws 1905, ch. 89, § 12; C.S. 1910, § 2893; C.S. 1920, § 3556; R.S. 1931, § 34-112; C.S. 1945, § 37-1109; W.S. 1957, § 33-198; Laws 1969, ch. 35, § 7; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 33-192.7; Laws 1981, ch. 172, § 1.

§ 33-15-108.
Licensing; qualifications; examinations; fees.

Any person who has a background that does not evidence conduct adverse to the practice of dentistry or to the ability to practice dentistry, who has graduated and attained the degree of doctor of dental surgery or doctor of dental medicine from a college or university in the United States or Canada accredited by the commission on dental accreditation of the American Dental Association, may apply to the board to have the applicant’s qualifications considered for licensure to practice dentistry. The applicant shall pass a written, clinical and state examination that follows national standards as determined by rule of the board.

The board may set fees for initial examinations and reexamination. Fees shall be paid to the board office before the examination or reexamination. The fee shall be paid by any method designated by the board, and in no case shall the fee be refunded.

The applicant shall be informed of the results of his examination within thirty (30) days after the examination.

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 181, § 2.

If the applicant fails the board examination three (3) times, he shall show evidence of additional education to the satisfaction of the board before he may be reexamined.

The board shall keep records of the names and addresses of all applicants and such other matters as affords a full record of the actions of the board. The records or transcripts of the records, duly certified by the president and secretary of the board with the seal of the board attached, is prima facie evidence before all courts of this state of the entries therein.

The board shall make and prescribe all reasonable rules for its government and for the conduct of its business.

The board may make and prescribe rules and regulations for the licensure and practice of dentistry in the state of Wyoming, not inconsistent with this act. For purposes of this subsection, “practice of dentistry” includes the work of dental hygienists, dental auxiliaries, dental technicians and dental laboratories.

History.

Laws 1905, ch. 89, § 4; C.S. 1910, § 2885; C.S. 1920, § 3548; Laws 1921, ch. 148, § 3; R.S. 1931, § 34-104; Laws 1935, ch. 61, § 1; 1937, ch. 122, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 37-1104; Laws 1955, ch. 242, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 33-199; Laws 1963, ch. 103, § 1; 1969, ch. 35, § 8; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 33-192.8; Laws 1973, ch. 213, § 2; 1979, ch. 74, § 1; 1981, ch. 172, § 1; 2007, ch. 210, § 2; 2009, ch. 181, §§ 1, 2; 2018 ch. 107, § 2, effective July 1, 2018; 2021 ch. 107, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, rewrote section generally.

The 2009 amendment,

added “and an examination on the Wyoming Dental Practice Act and the rules and regulations of the board of dental examiners” at the end of the second to last sentence of (a); repealed (d), which read: “An applicant who fails an examination may apply to the board for a reexamination at the next scheduled examination meeting. Application shall be made in writing and shall be accompanied by a fee as provided”; and inserted “licensure and” preceding “practice of dentistry” in (h).

Laws 2009, ch. 181, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 11, 2009.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (a)(i), substituted “who has a background that does not evidence conduct adverse to the practice of dentistry or to the ability to practice dentistry” for “of good moral character” following “Any person.”

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, in the last sentence of (a), substituted “clinical and state” for “and practical,” “that follows national standards as determined by rule of” for “in a manner satisfactory to,” deleted the former last sentence, which read, “The written examination shall consist of part I and part II of the national board of dental examinations administered by the joint commission on national dental examinations of the American Dental Association and an examination on the Wyoming Dental Practice Act and the rules and regulations of the board of dental examiners. The clinical practical examination shall be based on satisfactory completion of a clinical examination acceptable to the board” and made related changes; in (b), rewrote the first sentence, which read, “The board shall set the examination fee and all reexamination fees shall be the same as the current fee for the initial examination,” added “or reexamination” in the second sentence, and substituted “any method designated by the board” for “money order, cashier’s check or certified check” in the third sentence; deleted “in writing by certified mail” following “informed” in (c); and substituted “records of” for “a record book in which is recorded” in (f).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For meaning of “this act,” see § 33-15-128(a)(xvii).

Applicability. —

Laws 2021, ch. 107, § 2, provides: "The provisions of this act shall apply to the 2021-2022 application cycle for the board of dental examiners."

Requiring regional examination not abuse of discretion. —

Board of dental examiners did not abuse its discretion in requiring license applicant to pass a particular regional examination which, in the board's estimate, best tested the applicant's qualifications. Frank v. State, Wyoming Bd. of Dental Exmrs., 965 P.2d 674,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 143

(Wyo. 1998).

§ 33-15-109.
Renewal license certificate.

On or before December 31 of every second year, each dentist licensed to practice dentistry in this state and wishing to continue in the practice of dentistry shall submit a license renewal application with the applicable renewal fee. Any license granted by the board shall expire if the holder fails to secure the renewal certificate within three (3) months after the date that the license renewal application is required to be submitted.

Any dentist whose application for renewal indicates that the dentist has not actively practiced dentistry or engaged in teaching dentistry or dental hygiene for the preceding five (5) years shall be issued a renewal certificate only after demonstrating to the board that the dentist has maintained the qualifications set forth in this act. The board may require reexamination if it finds good cause to believe that the person has not maintained the professional ability and knowledge required of an original licensee.

The board may set continuing education requirements for renewal certificates and relicensure certificates. The board shall require three (3) hours of continuing education related to the responsible prescribing of controlled substances every two (2) years.

History.

Laws 1905, ch. 89, § 4; C.S. 1910, § 2885; C.S. 1920, § 3548; Laws 1921, ch. 148, § 3; R.S. 1931, § 34-104; Laws 1935, ch. 61, § 1; 1937, ch. 122, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 37-1104; Laws 1955, ch. 242, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 33-199; Laws 1963, ch. 103, § 1; 1969, ch. 35, § 9; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 33-192.9; Laws 1981, ch. 172, § 1; 2007, ch. 210, § 2; 2009, ch. 181, § 1; 2019 ch. 153, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2021 ch. 107, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, rewrote (a) and (b); and in (c), substituted “renewal certificates and relicensure certificates” for “relicensure.”

The 2009 amendment,

added the second sentence of (a).

Laws 2009, ch. 181, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 11, 2009.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (c), added the last sentence.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, in the first sentence of (a), substituted "of every second" for "each," in the second sentence, substituted "expire" for "be cancelled after ten (10) days notice by registered mail" and "the date that the license renewal application is required to be submitted" for "December 31 each year."

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2009, ch. 181, § 3, effective March 11, 2009, provides: “W.S. 33-15-109(a) as amended by this act shall apply to license renewal applications due on or before December 31, 2008.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For meaning of “this act,” see § 33-15-128(a)(xvii).

Applicability. —

Laws 2021, ch. 107, § 2, provides: "The provisions of this act shall apply to the 2021-2022 application cycle for the board of dental examiners."

§ 33-15-110.
Certificate entitles dentist to practice in any county; lost certificates.

The certificate provided for in this act entitles the holder to practice dentistry in any county in Wyoming. The board, upon satisfactory proof of loss of the certificate issued under this act, shall issue a new certificate. The cost of replacement shall be determined by the board and paid by the person requesting replacement.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 122, § 3; C.S. 1945, § 37-1110; W.S. 1957, § 33-202; Laws 1969, ch. 35, § 10; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 33-192.10; Laws 1981, ch. 172, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For meaning of “this act,” see § 33-15-128(a)(xvii).

§ 33-15-111.
List of licensees filed with board office.

The board shall annually publish a list of all dentists and dental hygienists licensed under this act. The list shall contain the name and address of each dentist and dental hygienist and such other information as the board deems advisable. The board office shall furnish copies to the public upon request or by access to the board’s website.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 122, § 4; C.S. 1945, § 37-1111; W.S. 1957, § 33-204; Laws 1969, ch. 35, § 11; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 33-192.11; Laws 1981, ch. 172, § 1; 2007, ch. 210, § 2.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, inserted “The board shall annually publish a” at the beginning of the paragraph, substituted “The” for “shall be published by the board each year. This” following “licensed under this act”, substituted “and” for “or” following “of each dentist”, substituted “office shall” for “shall place a copy of the list on file in the office of the secretary of state who shall” preceding “furnish copies to the public” and inserted “or by access to the board's website” at the end of the paragraph.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For meaning of “this act,” see § 33-15-128(a)(xvii).

§ 33-15-112.
Grounds and procedure for revocation or suspension of license.

The board may refuse to issue or renew a license, may suspend or revoke a license, may reprimand, restrict or impose conditions on the practice of a dentist for any one (1) or more of the following causes:

Conviction of, entry of a plea of nolo contendere to or entry of a deferred prosecution agreement pursuant to W.S.

7-13-301

to a felony or misdemeanor that relates adversely to the practice of dentistry or the ability to practice dentistry;

Renting or loaning to another person the dentist’s license or diploma to be used as a license or diploma for the other person;

Unprofessional conduct as defined in rules and regulations of the board;

Advertising or soliciting patients, in any form of communication, in a manner that is false or misleading in any material respect;

Being unfit or incompetent to practice dentistry for any reason, including but not limited to:

Inability to practice dentistry with reasonable skill and safety because of physical or mental disability or the use of alcohol, prescription drugs, nonprescription drugs or other psychoactive substance;

Performance of unsafe dental practice or failure to conform to the standards of acceptable professional dental practice, whether or not actual injury results.

Professional discipline by a professional licensing board in any jurisdiction;

Fraud, deceit or misrepresentation in providing any information or record to the board; or

Willful violation of any provisions of this act or rules and regulations of the board.

The proceedings under this section may be taken by the board from matters within its knowledge or upon information from another. If the informant is a member of the board, the other members of the board shall judge the accused. All complaints shall be in writing, verified by some party familiar with the facts alleged or by additional information or data which supports the complaint and shall be filed with the board. Upon receiving the complaint, the board shall proceed as in a contested case under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act and rules and regulations of the board. Upon revocation of any license, the fact shall be noted upon the records of the board and the license shall be marked cancelled upon the date of its revocation.

Upon receipt from the department of family services of a certified copy of an order from a court to withhold, suspend or otherwise restrict a license issued by the board, the board shall notify the party named in the court order of the withholding, suspension or restriction of the license in accordance with the terms of the court order. No appeal under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act shall be allowed for a license withheld, suspended or restricted under this subsection.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 122, § 10; C.S. 1945, § 37-1117; W.S. 1957, § 33-207; Laws 1969, ch. 35, § 12; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 33-192.12; Laws 1979, ch. 74, § 1; 1981, ch. 172, § 1; 1997, ch. 128, § 2; 2007, ch. 210, § 2.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, rewrote section generally.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For meaning of “this act,” see § 33-15-128(a)(xvii).

Law reviews. —

See “Scope of Review of Decision of an Administrative Agency in Wyoming,” 9 Wyo. L.J. 65 (1954).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of statute or rule making specified conduct or condition the ground for cancellation or suspension irrespective of licensee's personal fault, 3 ALR2d 107.

Admissibility and necessity of expert evidence in proceeding for revocation of license, 6 ALR2d 675.

Statute authorizing revocation of license upon conviction as applicable to conviction based on plea of nolo contendere or non vult, 89 ALR2d 540.

Alcoholism, narcotics addiction or misconduct with respect to alcohol or narcotics as ground for revocation or suspension of license to practice dentistry, 93 ALR2d 1398.

Revocation or suspension of dentist's license for false claims, reports or bills in connection with personal injury litigation, 95 ALR2d 873.

Disqualification, for bias or interest, of member of occupation or profession sitting in license revocation proceeding, 97 ALR2d 1210.

Improper or immoral conduct toward female patient as ground for disciplinary measure against physician or dentist, 15 ALR3d 1179.

Professional incompetency as ground for disciplinary measure against physician or dentist, 28 ALR3d 487.

Comment note on hearsay evidence in proceedings before state administrative agencies, 36 ALR3d 12.

Criminal prosecution or disciplinary action against medical practitioner for fraud in connection with claims for services provided under Medicaid, Medicare or similar welfare program, 50 ALR3d 549.

Wrongful or excessive prescription of drugs as ground for revocation or suspension of physician's or dentist's license to practice, 22 ALR4th 668.

Improper or immoral sexually related conduct toward patient as ground for disciplinary action against physician, dentist or other licensed healer, 59 ALR4th 1104.

Filing of false insurance claims for medical services as ground for disciplinary action against dentist, physician or other medical practitioner, 70 ALR4th 132.

Necessity of expert evidence in proceeding for revocation or suspension of license of physician, surgeon or dentist, 74 ALR4th 969.

Wrongful or excessive prescription of drugs as ground for revocation or suspension of physician's or dentist's license to practice. 19 A.L.R.6th 577.

§ 33-15-113.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 210, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1937, ch. 122, § 5, related to certificate of the secretary of state being prime facie proof that person is not entitled to practice dentistry.

§ 33-15-114.
Persons deemed to be practicing dentistry; work authorizations from licensed dentist.

Except as provided by paragraph (xii) of this subsection, any person is deemed to be practicing dentistry within the meaning of this act:

Who performs, or attempts, or advertises to perform, or causes to be performed by the patient or any other person, or instructs in the performance of any dental operation or oral surgery or dental service of any kind gratuitously or for a salary, fee, money or other remuneration paid, or to be paid, directly or indirectly, to himself or to any other person or agency;

Who is a manager, proprietor, operator or a conductor of a place where dental operations, oral surgery or dental services are performed;

Who directly or indirectly by any means or method furnishes, supplies, constructs, reproduces or repairs any prosthetic denture, bridge, appliance or other structure to be worn in the human mouth, or places such appliance or structure in the human mouth or attempts to adjust the same;

Who advertises to the public by any method to furnish, supply, construct, reproduce or repair any prosthetic denture, bridge, appliance or other structure to be worn in the human mouth;

Who diagnoses or professes to diagnose, prescribes for or professes to prescribe for, treats or professes to treat disease, pain, deformity, deficiency, injury or physical condition of human teeth or jaws, or adjacent structure;

Who extracts or attempts to extract human teeth, or corrects or professes to correct malpositions of teeth or of the jaw;

Who gives or professes to give interpretations or readings of dental radiographs;

Who administers an anesthetic of any nature in connection with dental operations;

Who uses the words “dentist”, “dental surgeon” or “oral surgeon”, the letters “D.D.S.”, “D.M.D.” or any other words, letters, title or descriptive matter which in any way represents him as being able to diagnose, treat, prescribe or operate for any disease, pain, deformity, deficiency, injury or physical condition of human teeth or jaws, or adjacent structures;

Who states or advertises or permits to be stated through any medium of communication that the licensee can perform or will attempt to perform dental treatment or render a diagnosis in connection therewith; or

Who engages in any of the practices included in the curriculum of an approved dental college;

A dental laboratory or dental technician is not practicing dentistry within the meaning of this act when engaged in the construction, making, alteration or repairing of bridges, crowns, dentures or other prosthetic or surgical appliances, or orthodontic appliances if the casts or molds or impressions upon which the work is constructed have been made by a regularly licensed and practicing dentist, and if all crowns, bridges, dentures or prosthetic appliances, surgical appliances or orthodontic appliances are returned to the dentist upon whose order the work is constructed.

Any licensed dentist who employs or engages the service of any person, firm or corporation to construct, reproduce, make, alter or repair bridges, crowns, dentures or other prosthetic, surgical or orthodontic appliances shall furnish the person with a written work authorization on forms prescribed by the board, which contain:

The name and address of the person to whom the work authorized is directed;

The patient’s name or identification number, but if only a number is used the patient’s name shall be written upon the duplicate copy of the work authorization retained by the dentist;

The date on which the work authorization was written;

A description of the work to be done, including diagrams, if necessary;

A specification of the type and quality of the material to be used;

The signature of the dentist and the number of his license to practice dentistry.

The person, firm or corporation receiving a work authorization from a licensed dentist shall retain the original work authorization and the dentist shall retain the duplicate copy for inspection at any reasonable time by the board or its authorized agents for two (2) years from date of issuance.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 35, § 14; W.S. 1957, § 33-192.14; Laws 1981, ch. 172, § 1; 2007, ch. 210, § 2.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a)(vii) substituted “radiographs” for “roentgenograms” at the end of sentence; in (a)(x) substituted “through any medium of communication that the licensee” for “or advertised by a sign, card, circular, handbill, newspaper, radio or otherwise that he” following “permits to be stated” and substituted “treatment” for “operations” preceding “or render a diagnosis.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For meaning of “this act,” see § 33-15-128(a)(xvii).

Dentist unauthorized to practice general nondental anesthesiology. —

A person licensed to practice dentistry in Wyoming who has special training and experience in the field of general anesthesia, but is not a licensed physician in Wyoming, is not authorized to practice general anesthesiology for nondental purposes. The restrictive language as used by the legislature in the Wyoming Dental Practice Act limits those licensed by that act to the practice of anesthesiology solely for purposes in connection with the oral cavity region. Also, the practice of general nondental anesthesiology is considered the “practice of medicine” as defined by the Paravecchio v. Memorial Hosp., 742 P.2d 1276,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 507

(Wyo. 1987), reh'g denied,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 523

(Wyo. Oct. 7, 1987), overruled in part, Torres v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2004 WY 92, 95 P.3d 794,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 2004).

Required licensure of general nondental anesthesiologists constitutional. —

No offense was dealt the equal protection clause of the United States constitution or the Wyoming state constitution by requiring that general nondental anesthesiologists be properly licensed as physicians under the Wyoming Medical Practice Act, and not just be declared qualified anesthesiologists by an accredited residency program. Paravecchio v. Memorial Hosp., 742 P.2d 1276,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 507

(Wyo. 1987), reh'g denied,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 523

(Wyo. Oct. 7, 1987), overruled in part, Torres v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2004 WY 92, 95 P.3d 794,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 2004).

Denturist not licensed to practice dentistry. —

District court properly upheld ruling of Wyoming Board of Dental Examiners that “denturist” was practicing dentistry without a license as a matter of law, rejecting argument that denturist was involved in the “mechanical task” of creating a prosthetic, not in curing disease; denturist's services violated Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

33-15-114

because he personally examined his customers, created their dentures, and later adjusted those dentures, if necessary.
Vollan v. Wyo. Bd. of Dental Exam'rs, 2007 WY 132, 165 P.3d 103,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 2007).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Constitutionality and construction of statutes or regulations prohibiting one who has no license to practice dentistry from owning, maintaining, or operating an office therefor, 20 ALR2d 808.

Regulation of prosthetic dentistry, 45 ALR2d 1243.

Single or isolated transaction as falling within provisions of licensing requirements, 93 ALR2d 90.

Practicing medicine, surgery, dentistry, optometry, podiatry, or other healing arts without license as a separate or continuing offense, 99 ALR2d 654.

§ 33-15-115.
Persons to whom chapter inapplicable.

Nothing in this act contained applies:

To a legally qualified medical doctor;

To a legally qualified dental hygienist or dentist engaged in full-time duties with the United States armed forces, public health service, veterans administration or other federal agencies;

To a legally qualified dental hygienist or dentist of another state making a clinical demonstration before a meeting of dentists or dental auxiliaries; or

To dental and dental hygiene students actively enrolled in any American Dental Association accredited dental educational program performing services as a part of the curriculum of that program under the direct supervision of a Wyoming licensed dentist or Wyoming licensed dental hygienist instructor.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 35, § 15; W.S. 1957, § 33-192.15; Laws 1981, ch. 172, § 1; 1993, ch. 81, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) of this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For meaning of “this act,” see § 33-15-128(a)(xvii).

§ 33-15-116.
Certain persons prohibited from soliciting patronage of general public.

No person engaged in business of constructing, altering or repairing bridges, crowns, dentures or other prosthetic appliances, surgical appliances or orthodontic appliances shall directly or indirectly solicit the patronage of the general public.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 35, § 16; W.S. 1957, § 33-192.16; Laws 1981, ch. 172, § 1.

§ 33-15-117.
Dental laboratory technicians.

Dentists may employ one (1) or more dental laboratory technicians who work only under the direction and supervision of the dentist and who shall not be permitted under any circumstances to do any work upon any patient. Dental laboratory technicians shall not be allowed to do laboratory work of any kind except at the direction of dentists duly licensed to practice, and then only upon written prescription issued by the dentists.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 122, § 7; C.S. 1945, § 37-1114; W.S. 1957, § 33-206; Laws 1969, ch. 35, § 17; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 33-192.17; Laws 1981, ch. 172, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to dental hygienists, see §

33-15-119

et seq.

§ 33-15-118.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1981, ch. 172, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1969, ch. 35, § 18, related to use of certain initials or words as evidence of the practice of dentistry.